Arkansas, session 2025, HB1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY.
(a) Effective January 1, 2027, the offices of sheriff and tax
collector in Poinsett County, Arkansas, shall be separate offices.
(b) At the 2026 general election, the electors of Poinsett County
shall elect both a sheriff and a tax collector, and each officer so elected
shall take office on January 1, 2027.
(c) The sheriff and the tax collector in Poinsett County shall each
give bond for the faithful performance of their respective duties as provided
by law.
(d) The sheriff and the tax collector of Poinsett County shall each
receive compensation that shall be determined by the Poinsett County Quorum
Court within the minimum and maximum compensation range prescribed by the
General Assembly and shall hire deputies and have other allowances as
prescribed by the Poinsett County Quorum Court.




*SSS022*
11/21/2024 9:47:31 AM SSS022